Utah statutes.
78A-2-408.   Transcripts and copies -- Fees -- Establishment of Court
Reporting Technology Account.
(1)  The Judicial Council shall by rule provide for a standard page format for
transcripts of court hearings.
(2) (a)  The fee for a transcript of a court session, or any part of a court
session, shall be $3.50 per page, which includes the initial preparation of
the transcript and one certified copy.  The preparer shall deposit the
original transcript with the clerk of the court and provide the person
requesting the transcript with the certified copy.  The cost of additional
copies shall be as provided in Subsection 78A-2-301(1).  The transcript for an
appeal shall be prepared within the time period permitted by the rules of
Appellate Procedure.  The fee for a transcript prepared within three business
days of the request shall be 1-1/2 times the base rate.  The fee for a
transcript prepared within one business day of the request shall be double the
base rate.
(b)  When a transcript is ordered by the court, the fees shall be paid by the
parties to the action in equal proportion or as ordered by the court.  The fee
for a transcript in a criminal case in which the defendant is found to be
impecunious shall be paid pursuant to Section 77-32-305.
(c)  There is established within the General Fund a restricted account known
as the Court Reporting Technology Account.  The clerk of the court shall
transfer to the state treasurer for deposit into this account all fees
received under this section.  The state court administrator may draw upon this
account for the purchase, development, and maintenance of court reporting
technologies and for other expenses necessary for maintaining a verbatim
record of court sessions.
(3)  The fee for the preparation of a transcript of a court hearing by an
official court transcriber other than an official court reporter and the fee
for the preparation of the transcript by a certified shorthand reporter of a
hearing before any referee, master, board, or commission of this state shall
be as provided in Subsection (2)(a), and shall be payable to the person
preparing the transcript.
